Wyoming, session 2025, HB0231.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1.

(a) There is appropriated two million one hundred
seventy-six thousand three hundred thirteen dollars
($2,176,313.00) from the general fund to the University of
Wyoming for purposes of providing medical education under
this section. Not more than fifty-three thousand eighty-one
dollars ($53,081.00) of this appropriation shall be
HB0231

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0624
expended for administrative costs incurred by the
University of Wyoming in providing medical education under
this section. This appropriation shall be for the period
beginning with the effective date of this section and
ending June 30, 2029. This appropriation shall not be
transferred or expended for any other purpose.
Notwithstanding W.S. 9-2-1008, 9-2-1012(e) and 9-4-207, any
unexpended, unobligated funds from this appropriation shall
revert as provided by law on June 30, 2028. It is the
intent of the legislature that this appropriation be
doubled and included in the University of Wyoming's
standard budget for the immediately succeeding fiscal
biennium.

(b) The board of trustees of the University of
Wyoming is authorized to expand the course of training and
education offered by the university in the field of
medicine under a contract with the university of Utah
school of medicine as specified in subsection (c) of this
section and in accordance with W.S. 21-17-109.

HB0231

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0624
(c) Medical training and education offered by the
University of Wyoming under a contract with the university
of Utah shall be subject to all of the following:

(i) Medical education shall be available for not
more than five (5) Wyoming resident students for a period
of four (4) years, commencing with academic year 2025‑2026;

(ii) The board of trustees of the University of
Wyoming shall obtain agreements from each student as
required by W.S. 21-17-109(d);

(iii) Medical education shall be subject to all
requirements of W.S. 21-17-109.

Section 2. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.
(END)
HB0231